Utah statutes.
70A-2a-108.   Unconscionability.
(1)  If the court as a matter of law finds a lease contract or any clause of a
lease contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court
may refuse to enforce the lease contract, or it may enforce the remainder of
the lease contract without the unconscionable clause, or it may limit the
application of an unconscionable clause to avoid any unconscionable result.
(2)  With respect to a consumer lease, if the court as a matter of law finds
that a lease contract or any clause of a lease contract has been induced by
unconscionable conduct, or that unconscionable conduct has occurred in the
collection of a claim arising from a lease contract, the court may grant
appropriate relief.
(3)  Before making a finding of unconscionability under Subsection (1) or (2),
the court, on its own motion or that of a party, shall afford the parties a
reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to the setting, purpose, and
effect of the lease contract or clause thereof, or of the conduct.
(4)  In an action in which the lessee claims unconscionability with respect to
a consumer lease:
(a)  If the court finds unconscionability under Subsection (1) or (2), the
court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to the lessee.
(b)  If the court does not find unconscionability and the lessee claiming
unconscionability has brought or maintained an action he knew to be
groundless, the court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to the party
against whom the claim is made.
(c)  In determining attorney's fees, the amount of the recovery on behalf of
the claimant under Subsections (1) and (2) is not controlling.
